Utah statutes.
34-23-401.   Investigation by division -- Administrative penalty.
(1)  The director of the division or the director's designee shall have
authority to enter and inspect any place or establishment covered by this
chapter and to have access to such records as may aid in the enforcement of
this chapter.
(2)  The division may investigate any complaint under this chapter and may
commence an administrative proceeding with a penalty of up to $500 per
violation.  Administrative proceedings conducted under this section shall be
consistent with Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act.
